Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 1 Officers

38-2-210.
Appointment and promotion of commissioned officers; filling of vacancies; grounds for removal.

All commissioned officers of the organized militia shall be appointed and promoted by the Governor upon recommendation of the commanding general or the commanding officer of the force in which such officers are to serve, or are serving. In the filling of vacancies, preference shall be given to personnel of the organized militia of the state when they are otherwise qualified.

Commissioned officers of the organized militia may be removed in accordance with the applicable laws of the United States and the provisions of this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-505, 86-516; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 40; Ga. L. 1959, p. 114, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 740, § 2.

38-2-211.
Qualifications.

No person shall be appointed or promoted as a commissioned officer of the organized militia unless he shall have passed such examination as to his physical, moral, and professional qualifications as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States and by this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder. No person shall be recognized as a commissioned officer of the organized militia and no appointment as such shall become effective until he shall have taken and subscribed an oath of office.

Any person who has been dismissed or discharged from the organized militia of this or any other state or from the armed forces of the United States or any reserve component thereof under other than honorable conditions and has not been restored to duty shall not be eligible for appointment as a commissioned officer in any force of the organized militia.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-504; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 41.

38-2-212.
Assignment and transfer.

Commissioned officers may be assigned, reassigned, transferred, or detailed to and from units within the Army National Guard, to and from units within the Air National Guard, and to and from units within the Georgia Naval Militia as prescribed by the laws of the United States and by this chapter and by the regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-605; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 42.

38-2-213.
Oath of office; by whom administered.

Every commissioned officer of the organized militia shall take and subscribe the oath of office prescribed for officers of the organized militia by the applicable laws of the United States and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. The oath shall be taken and subscribed before an officer of the organized militia authorized to administer oaths as provided in this chapter or before a notary public or other officer authorized by the laws of this state to administer oaths.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-510; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 43.

38-2-214.
Uniforms and equipment.

Every commissioned officer shall provide himself with such uniforms and articles of equipment as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1003; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 44.

38-2-215.
Efficiency and medical examining boards — Consideration by; composition and appointment of.

The efficiency, moral character, and general fitness for retention in the organized militia of any commissioned officer may be investigated and determined by an efficiency examining board. The members of an efficiency examining board shall be senior in rank to the officer under investigation unless such senior officers are unavailable.

The physical fitness for further service of any commissioned officer in the organized militia may be investigated and determined by a medical examining board of officers.

Efficiency and medical examining boards shall be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the adjutant general; provided, however, that whenever an examining board is appointed for the purpose of determining the fitness of any officer for continued federal recognition, the board shall be appointed by the commander designated in the applicable laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 45.

38-2-216.
Efficiency and medical examining boards — Powers; procedure for appearances; discharge; transfer to reserve or retired list.

Efficiency and medical examining boards appointed by the Governor are vested with the powers of courts of inquiry and courts-martial. The boards shall follow the practice and procedure prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and the state and the regulations issued thereunder. Any officer ordered to appear before such a board shall be allowed to appear in person or by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses, and to call witnesses in his behalf. He shall at all stages of the proceeding be allowed full access to records pertinent to his case and be furnished with copies of the same. Failure to appear before any such examining board shall be sufficient ground for a finding by the board that the officer ordered to appear should be discharged. If the findings of the board are unfavorable to an officer and are approved as provided by applicable laws of the United States or by the Governor, the Governor shall relieve the officer from duty and shall give him a discharge in such form as may be appropriate; provided, however, that if the discharge of an officer is recommended solely because of physical inability to perform active service, the officer may be transferred to the state reserve list or the state retired list in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 46.

Cross references.

Convening of general courts-martial by Governor, § 38-2-390.

Courts of inquiry generally, § 38-2-570.

38-2-217.
Resignations; acts constituting resignation; types of discharge after resignation; resignation of officers who are accountable for military funds or property.

A commissioned officer of the organized militia may tender his resignation at any time to the Governor. If the Governor accepts the resignation, the officer shall receive an honorable discharge; but, if the officer tendering his resignation is under arrest or if charges have been preferred against him for the commission of an offense punishable by a court-martial, he may be given a discharge in such form as the Governor may direct.

Enlistment in the regular army, air force, navy, marine corps, or coast guard of the United States shall be deemed a resignation by the person so enlisting of all commissions in the militia held by him.

The acceptance of a commission in the organized militia shall be deemed a resignation by the person accepting the same of any other commission held by him in the militia.

Permanent removal from the state of an officer of the organized militia shall be deemed a resignation.

All officers of the organized militia accountable or responsible for military funds or property who tender their resignations or who are deemed to have resigned shall be transferred immediately to an unassigned list pending discharge from such accountability or responsibility. The transfer shall not relieve the officers of their liability until they are discharged therefrom as provided by the laws of the United States and by this chapter and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-514; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 47.

38-2-218.
Absence without leave.

Any commissioned officer of the organized militia who absents himself without leave for three months may be dismissed by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 48; Ga. L. 1969, p. 228, § 2.

38-2-219.
Warrant officers.

The provisions of this article relating to commissioned officers shall apply to warrant officers and commissioned warrant officers except that warrant officers who have been absent without leave may be discharged as may be prescribed by the applicable laws of the United States and by this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 49.